Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.020

Annual report by superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction shall review annually the transitional bilingual instruction program and shall submit a report of such review to the legislature on or before February 1st of each year.

[ 2017 c 123 s 1; 1984 c 124 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.58.801.]